Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-392
Insurance; solicitation and sale; when authorized.

Any bank, trust company, investment company, bank affiliate, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or association, owned or controlled by any bank located in this state, may sell or solicit any kind or form of insurance, either directly or indirectly, through any officer, agent, employee, or representative thereof. The sale and solicitation of insurance pursuant to this section shall be subject to compliance with the insurance laws of this state and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder.

Laws 1933, c. 74, § 1, p. 316;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-349;

R.S.1943, § 44-392;

Laws 1959, c. 202, § 1, p. 711;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 236;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 222;

Laws 1999, LB 191, § 1.